lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 0 ples .
SFX 4288 Y 1
SFX 4288 0 ater's .
SFX 2058 Y 1
SFX 2058 0 va's .
SFX 2735 Y 1
SFX 2735 0 pence .
SFX 4494 Y 1
SFX 4494 0 thing's .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 alism's .
SFX 3743 Y 1
SFX 3743 0 shine .
SFX 3148 Y 1
SFX 3148 0 shing .
SFX 3086 Y 1
SFX 3086 0 tical .
SFX 1981 Y 1
SFX 1981 0 eville .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 0 ache's .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 ships .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 oning .
SFX 2313 Y 1
SFX 2313 0 tness's .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 0 shire .
SFX 4394 Y 1
SFX 4394 0 urally .
SFX 3887 Y 1
SFX 3887 0 nus's .
SFX 1010 Y 1
SFX 1010 0 meter .
SFX 1842 Y 1
SFX 1842 0 ticks .
SFX 4088 Y 1
SFX 4088 0 iff's .
SFX 1884 Y 1
SFX 1884 0 phone .
SFX 4635 Y 1
SFX 4635 0 sail's .
SFX 4203 Y 1
SFX 4203 0 eningly .
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 0 hills .
SFX 4469 Y 1
SFX 4469 0 tocking .
SFX 3290 Y 1
SFX 3290 0 monger's .
SFX 3284 Y 1
SFX 3284 0 nation's .
SFX 2677 Y 1
SFX 2677 0 smanship's .
SFX 1257 Y 1
SFX 1257 0 cing .
SFX 3474 Y 1
SFX 3474 0 ement .
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 0 nell's .
SFX 2046 Y 1
SFX 2046 0 -heartedness .
SFX 3510 Y 1
SFX 3510 0 city .
SFX 2798 Y 1
SFX 2798 0 menting .
SFX 1909 Y 1
SFX 1909 0 nda's .
SFX 3640 Y 1
SFX 3640 0 uations .
SFX 3002 Y 1
SFX 3002 0 -fourth .
SFX 3726 Y 1
SFX 3726 0 so's .
SFX 4471 Y 1
SFX 4471 0 tlessness's .
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 0 speople .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 0 dy's .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 anne's .
SFX 1145 Y 1
SFX 1145 0 lled .
SFX 3318 Y 1
SFX 3318 0 ller .
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 0 siness's .
SFX 3643 Y 1
SFX 3643 0 ualized .
SFX 3642 Y 1
SFX 3642 0 ualizes .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 ra's .
SFX 1614 Y 1
SFX 1614 0 don's .
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 0 ographies .
SFX 2247 Y 1
SFX 2247 0 ck's .
SFX 2581 Y 1
SFX 2581 0 -off's .
SFX 2398 Y 1
SFX 2398 0 nn's .
SFX 4342 Y 1
SFX 4342 0 yle .
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 0 wood .
SFX 3539 Y 1
SFX 3539 0 balling .
SFX 3711 Y 1
SFX 3711 0 standing .
SFX 3646 Y 1
SFX 3646 0 type's .
SFX 4122 Y 1
SFX 4122 0 ialism's .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 ising .
SFX 4935 Y 1
SFX 4935 0 mated .
SFX 4665 Y 1
SFX 4665 0 rned .
SFX 1065 Y 1
SFX 1065 0 mates .
SFX 3450 Y 1
SFX 3450 0 eying .
SFX 1967 Y 1
SFX 1967 0 hop's .
SFX 1749 Y 1
SFX 1749 0 iation .
SFX 2045 Y 1
SFX 2045 0 about .
SFX 4828 Y 1
SFX 4828 0 ogically .
SFX 2666 Y 1
SFX 2666 0 stroke .
SFX 1710 Y 1
SFX 1710 0 matic .
SFX 1840 Y 1
SFX 1840 0 tnesses .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 0 lation's .
SFX 3408 Y 1
SFX 3408 0 hells .
SFX 3372 Y 1
SFX 3372 0 im's .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 0 sey's .
SFX 3343 Y 1
SFX 3343 0 ivated .
SFX 4048 Y 1
SFX 4048 0 ivates .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 0 ringly .
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 0 ssa's .
SFX 1407 Y 1
SFX 1407 0 ports .
SFX 1887 Y 1
SFX 1887 0 people .
SFX 4019 Y 1
SFX 4019 0 ldo's .
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 0 ity's .
SFX 3283 Y 1
SFX 3283 0 national .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 0 win's .
SFX 2802 Y 1
SFX 2802 0 lor's .
SFX 3841 Y 1
SFX 3841 0 pelling .
SFX 2315 Y 1
SFX 2315 0 tler's .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 son's .
SFX 4539 Y 1
SFX 4539 0 taff .
SFX 2631 Y 1
SFX 2631 0 truck .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 ized .
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 0 red's .
SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 0 izer .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 izes .
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 0 day's .
SFX 4473 Y 1
SFX 4473 0 titutions .
SFX 4798 Y 1
SFX 4798 0 oo's .
SFX 2662 Y 1
SFX 2662 0 talk .
SFX 3694 Y 1
SFX 3694 0 tall .
SFX 3112 Y 1
SFX 3112 0 tals .
SFX 1657 Y 1
SFX 1657 0 tand .
SFX 4534 Y 1
SFX 4534 0 tant .
SFX 4020 Y 1
SFX 4020 0 ldo .
SFX 2406 Y 1
SFX 2406 0 nder's .
SFX 4664 Y 1
SFX 4664 0 rness .
SFX 3245 Y 1
SFX 3245 0 orer's .
SFX 4533 Y 1
SFX 4533 0 tars .
SFX 3691 Y 1
SFX 3691 0 tary .
SFX 3801 Y 1
SFX 3801 0 rides .
SFX 4393 Y 1
SFX 4393 0 urance .
SFX 1406 Y 1
SFX 1406 0 pot's .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 0 neck's .
SFX 1283 Y 1
SFX 1283 0 tate .
SFX 4793 Y 1
SFX 4793 0 ophone's .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 ridge .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 na's .
SFX 4442 Y 1
SFX 4442 0 tying .
SFX 3667 Y 1
SFX 3667 0 titution .
SFX 590 Y 1
SFX 590 0 lla .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 lle .
SFX 4962 Y 1
SFX 4962 0 lls .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 lly .
SFX 4470 Y 1
SFX 4470 0 tlessnesses .
SFX 3784 Y 1
SFX 3784 0 rousness .
SFX 3585 Y 1
SFX 3585 0 wells .
SFX 502 Y 1
SFX 502 0 abilities .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 some .
SFX 2991 Y 1
SFX 2991 0 -onefold .
SFX 4980 Y 1
SFX 4980 0 lic's .
SFX 2869 Y 1
SFX 2869 0 ician's .
SFX 4131 Y 1
SFX 4131 0 hines .
SFX 4595 Y 1
SFX 4595 0 sickness .
SFX 1472 Y 1
SFX 1472 0 hings .
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 0 rable .
SFX 2137 Y 1
SFX 2137 0 phone's .
SFX 3822 Y 1
SFX 3822 0 rage .
SFX 2446 Y 1
SFX 2446 0 kling .
SFX 2727 Y 1
SFX 2727 0 rail .
SFX 4320 Y 1
SFX 4320 0 action .
SFX 1836 Y 1
SFX 1836 0 ture's .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 sel's .
SFX 4724 Y 1
SFX 4724 0 rams .
SFX 4923 Y 1
SFX 4923 0 miness's .
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 0 terly .
SFX 3039 Y 1
SFX 3039 0 utations .
SFX 4513 Y 1
SFX 4513 0 terns .
SFX 3464 Y 1
SFX 3464 0 eriorly .
SFX 3475 Y 1
SFX 3475 0 em's .
SFX 3157 Y 1
SFX 3157 0 scope's .
SFX 2136 Y 1
SFX 2136 0 pie's .
SFX 4822 Y 1
SFX 4822 0 ogy's .
SFX 2668 Y 1
SFX 2668 0 stock .
SFX 3057 Y 1
SFX 3057 0 ula's .
SFX 4412 Y 1
SFX 4412 0 ularization .
SFX 4722 Y 1
SFX 4722 0 rays .
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 0 n's .
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 0 n't .
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 lands .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 ency's .
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 per's .
SFX 4179 Y 1
SFX 4179 0 ession .
SFX 2929 Y 1
SFX 2929 0 drops .
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 0 imes .
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 0 'll .
SFX 4768 Y 1
SFX 4768 0 pads .
SFX 1344 Y 1
SFX 1344 0 chers .
SFX 4090 Y 1
SFX 4090 0 iferous .
SFX 1070 Y 1
SFX 1070 0 lock's .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 0 lights .
SFX 4067 Y 1
SFX 4067 0 ique's .
SFX 4102 Y 1
SFX 4102 0 icking .
SFX 3573 Y 1
SFX 3573 0 've .
SFX 3851 Y 1
SFX 3851 0 pans .
SFX 3022 Y 1
SFX 3022 0 wings .
SFX 2467 Y 1
SFX 2467 0 ionals .
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 0 lants .
SFX 3671 Y 1
SFX 3671 0 ticism .
SFX 1378 Y 1
SFX 1378 0 stown .
SFX 321 Y 1
SFX 321 0 park .
SFX 3849 Y 1
SFX 3849 0 part .
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 0 dled .
SFX 1173 Y 1
SFX 1173 0 dler .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 dles .
SFX 3834 Y 1
SFX 3834 0 play's .
SFX 4577 Y 1
SFX 4577 0 sonic .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 iness's .
SFX 3231 Y 1
SFX 3231 0 path .
SFX 2466 Y 1
SFX 2466 0 ionary .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 boards .
SFX 4784 Y 1
SFX 4784 0 oriness's .
SFX 3843 Y 1
SFX 3843 0 pects .
SFX 3028 Y 1
SFX 3028 0 walls .
SFX 4384 Y 1
SFX 4384 0 usness's .
SFX 3616 Y 1
SFX 3616 0 utable .
SFX 3257 Y 1
SFX 3257 e ologies e
SFX 2476 Y 1
SFX 2476 e igh e
SFX 1152 Y 1
SFX 1152 g king g
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 c ng c
SFX 3425 Y 1
SFX 3425 e ging e
SFX 1920 Y 1
SFX 1920 d ll's d
SFX 1704 Y 1
SFX 1704 d ng d
SFX 4037 Y 1
SFX 4037 e ka's e
SFX 2809 Y 1
SFX 2809 e ll's e
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 e ng e
SFX 1125 Y 1
SFX 1125 c sers c
SFX 4875 Y 1
SFX 4875 g ng g
SFX 1071 Y 1
SFX 1071 g ll's g
SFX 4204 Y 1
SFX 4204 a eni a
SFX 2710 Y 1
SFX 2710 p rked p
SFX 3274 Y 1
SFX 3274 l ng l
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 m ng m
SFX 4671 Y 1
SFX 4671 p rkiest p
SFX 4619 Y 1
SFX 4619 n sers n
SFX 3519 Y 1
SFX 3519 a ce a
SFX 4618 Y 1
SFX 4618 p sers p
SFX 4256 Y 1
SFX 4256 b ce b
SFX 3060 Y 1
SFX 3060 t ugh's t
SFX 2295 Y 1
SFX 2295 a us's a
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 e ness e
SFX 1256 Y 1
SFX 1256 b ck's b
SFX 4353 Y 1
SFX 4353 n wn's n
SFX 2294 Y 1
SFX 2294 e us's e
SFX 1841 Y 1
SFX 1841 l tively l
SFX 4752 Y 1
SFX 4752 f ph's f
SFX 3256 Y 1
SFX 3256 e ologist's e
SFX 417 Y 1
SFX 417 i us's i
SFX 4626 Y 1
SFX 4626 a sed a
SFX 4490 Y 1
SFX 4490 c ties c
SFX 2839 Y 1
SFX 2839 e itional e
SFX 2435 Y 1
SFX 2435 d lled d
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 c sed c
SFX 875 Y 1
SFX 875 o us's o
SFX 3984 Y 1
SFX 3984 e lled e
SFX 2186 Y 1
SFX 2186 e ium e
SFX 1412 Y 1
SFX 1412 m ph's m
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 g lled g
SFX 4969 Y 1
SFX 4969 h lled h
SFX 3315 Y 1
SFX 3315 g llet g
SFX 1864 Y 1
SFX 1864 p rts p
SFX 3048 Y 1
SFX 3048 t us's t
SFX 1824 Y 1
SFX 1824 t uting t
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 n sed n
SFX 2628 Y 1
SFX 2628 r tte's r
SFX 4625 Y 1
SFX 4625 p sed p
SFX 3059 Y 1
SFX 3059 t ughed t
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 r sed r
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 s ties s
SFX 4715 Y 1
SFX 4715 n reen's n
SFX 3183 Y 1
SFX 3183 n ria n
SFX 1002 Y 1
SFX 1002 d nts d
