lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Geri/140,174,1264,1505,2247
Lori/1,2,16,21,27,30,33,40,76,117,138,230,263,522,543,555,573,762,763,1264,1427,1505,1909,3162,3163,3178,3180,3935,3936,4718,4719
Parr/1,18,31,115,1449,2781,2782
Ree/1,2,6,111,120,201,230,263,280,292,385,528,1053,1188,2030,2058,2059
Richmond/680
Rod/1,6,16,30,33,53,61,75,106,182,201,213,228,234,276,307,362,392,402,460,588,589,626,650,725,756,2118,2358
Sharp/1,16,21,123,1981
age/1,2,3,6,13,19,47,50,59,65,67,73,79,164,172,196,211,246,281,403,552,683,707,1308,1427,1557,1896,1909,2150,2162
alum/1,2,111,120,228,234,397,1454,3887,3888
dam/1,2,4,8,16,21,27,71,109,113,151,159,167,185,187,195,202,207,210,231,237,250,251,285,331,764,920,1665,1913,2042,2127,2267,2348,2349,2377,2409,2420,2776,3154,3227,3282,3284,3557,3839,3934
dung/717,2488,2530,3469
fain/2,3,4,9,26,38,48,57,82,97,119,127,568,833,1192,1840,2313
fat/1,2,3,4,5,8,10,11,16,17,21,25,28,48,57,82,137,157,169,301,327,375,401,424,434,442,444,450,501,506,565,583,596,605,653,677,697,718,769,798,799,800,818,833,870,879,1047,1266,1506,1655,1759,1844,1969,1970,2003,2039,2064,2237,2298,2299,2325,2534,2535,2611,2674,3053,3483,3726,4522
grove/1,2,13,15,19,46,52,121,160,168,212,252,1012,1145,1148,3318,3981,3983
gut/1,2,48,50,57,82,119,127,157,164,196,230,246,261,301,380,418,437,450,506,540,732,837,886,3143,3736
habit/1,2,3,4,35,89,102,104,186,226,299,348,349,376,426,502,803,825,927,1180,2303,2304,2556,2557,2620,2621,2622,3062,3063,3640,3641,4430
heart/1,2,3,4,18,34,36,37,50,56,72,74,83,116,129,149,164,169,172,196,198,203,224,246,249,273,296,297,316,360,448,471,728,1098,1629,2271,2272,2546,3530,3531,3705,3737,4203,4262,4266,4281,4282,4593,4594,4595
here/182,339,380,586,659,929,934,2045,2274,2322,3086,4052,4053
idol/1,2,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,166,244,257,265,271,274,295,4288,4289
interrelation/1,2,150,188,199
less/3,8,9,83,100,101,105,114,118,224,229,255,296,297,322,384,1301,1303,1374
liter/25,245,583,653,800,919,1352,2035,2039,2560,2963,2964,2965,3561,3562,3563,4287
must/354,414,630,1220,1629,2271,2272,2566,3573
pave/2,6,7,13,15,41,42,44,96,122,2422,2798
pay/2,3,4,9,12,14,35,41,42,44,229,255,332,375,384,388,444,538,632,738,954,1001,1027,1037,1066,1067,1222,1252,1253,1432,1550,1552,1883,1884,2392,2434,2581,3788,4582,4657
qua/18,31,201,283,511,829,1434,1858,2436,2437,2682,3146,3148
regal/2,3,4,5,8,9,16,133,158,3474,4207,4721
rip/2,109,113,207,250,251,632,738,1001,1037,1651,1685,1686,1861,1879,2127,2128,2320,2351,2646,3159,3222,3225,3546,3547,3765,3766,3833
scandal/1,2,3,4,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,181,311,420,496,3289,3290,3291
scar/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,16,18,34,36,56,74,109,113,129,179,184,285,292,331,410,498,517,521,594,620,621,622,719,745,782,817,1087,1093,1177,1188,1480,1765,1980,2224,2815,2816,3510
script/1816,1817,2283,2297,2591,4346,4394
sher/141,956,1070,4088,4089
shrive/2,6,7,13,27,46,49,52,160,1012,1145
six/1,8,9,155,157,192,261,279,301,2328,2735,3099,3100,3413,3840,4526,4601,4756
soft/2,5,9,10,11,17,18,31,37,38,61,83,224,249,296,297,448,535,629,647,694,724,728,821,873,874,964,1029,1044,1268,1269,2046,3568
sour/11,17,292,385,863,1257,1258
sport/1,2,3,4,9,18,34,36,51,56,72,74,99,173,253,318,428,438,439,508,1284,1285,1377,2096,2097,2677
sun/1,2,50,140,151,159,208,218,227,264,364,407,474,527,534,639,663,708,779,819,966,1201,1294,1341,1342,1376,1423,1555,1659,1676,1766,1803,2222,2346,2347,2356,2450,2666,2711,2810,2899,3121,3122,3423,3424,3724,3743,3904,3905,4143,4262,4606,4632,4867
tee/1,2,3,6,13,27,71,82,127,210,231,237,264,290,418,437,453,488,1423,1555,1652,2080,2324,3089,3090,3677,4494,4501,4922
tick/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,29,32,46,52,88,121,145,153,168,171,197,212,551,563,1650,2312,2640,3319,4469
trade/1,2,6,7,13,15,19,428,438,439,508,632,780,813,814,1037,1038,1221,1284,1285,1310,1377,1712,2169,2425,2791,2999,4572
twenty/1,155,2577,2578,2579,2580,2978,2979,2980,2981,2982,2983,2984,2985,2986,2987,2988,2989,2990,2991,2992,2993,2994,2995,3001,3002,3003,3004,3005,3006,3007,3008,3009,3010,3011,3012,3013
volt/952,1010,1142
was/8,285,331,517,1220,4634,4635,4636,4745
